Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.002

Legislative declaration, intent—Purpose.

The legislature finds that the statutory law relating to savings and loan associations has not been generally updated or modernized since 1945; and, as a result, many changes to Title 33 RCW should now be made with respect to the powers and duties of the director; to the provisions relating to the organization, management and conversion of savings and loan associations; and to the powers and restrictions placed upon savings and loan associations to make investments. While it is the intent of the legislature to grant permissive investment powers to state-chartered savings and loan associations, it does not intend these associations to abandon the residential financing market in Washington. It, therefore, finds that the powers granted in chapter 3, Laws of 1982 are for the purpose of updating and modernizing the law relating to savings and loan associations, thereby creating a more secure and responsive financial environment in which the residential homebuyer will continue to obtain financing.

[ 1994 c 92 s 413; 1982 c 3 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 3 s 118.]